Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.206

Structural pest inspector licenses—Exemption—Home inspectors.

A person licensed as a home inspector under chapter 18.280 RCW is exempt from licensing as a structural pest inspector except when reporting on the identification of or damage by wood destroying insects.

[ 2008 c 119 s 23.]